Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1244
Horseracing industry participant, defined.

For purposes of sections 2-1243 to 2-1246, horseracing industry participant shall mean an individual who currently holds a valid license for purposes of conducting horseracing from the State Racing and Gaming Commission and who owns, trains, cares for, or rides horses stabled at a licensed racetrack enclosure in this state for the purpose of horseracing at the live race meeting at such racetrack.

Laws 1993, LB 471, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 24;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 11.